Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.790

Outdoor-based activities—Instructional days.

(1) The superintendent of public instruction, subject to conformity with application or other requirements adopted by rule, shall approve requests by public schools as provided in RCW 28A.320.173 to consider student participation in seasonal or nonseasonal outdoor-based activities, including programs established in accordance with RCW 28A.300.793, and the outdoor education experiences program established in RCW 28A.300.795, as instructional days for the purposes of basic education requirements established in RCW 28A.150.220(5).

(2) The superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement this section.

[ 2022 c 112 s 4; 2018 c 266 s 410.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 112: See note following RCW 28A.300.793.